Maryland, session 2026, HB0858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–132.
(a) In this section, “wrongful detainer” means to hold possession of real property
without the right of possession.
(b) This section does not apply if:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0858*

HOUSE BILL 858
(1) The person in actual possession of the property has been granted
possession under a court order;
(2) A remedy is available under Title 8 of this article; or
(3) Any other exclusive means to recover possession is provided by statute
or rule.
(c) A person may not hold possession of property unless the person is entitled to
possession of the property under the law.
(d) (1) If a person violates subsection (c) of this section, a person claiming
possession may make complaint in writing to the District Court of the county in which the
property is located.
(2) (i) On receipt of a complaint under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the court shall summons immediately the person in possession to appear before the court
on the day specified in the summons to show cause, if any, why restitution of the possession
of the property to the person filing the complaint should not be made.
(ii) A hearing scheduled under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
shall be held not more than [10 business] 14 CALENDAR days after the complaint is filed
under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) If, for any reason, the person in actual possession cannot be found after
two good faith efforts on different days, the person authorized to serve process by the
Maryland Rules shall:
(i) File an affidavit with the court describing the good faith efforts
to serve the person in actual possession;
(ii) Mail a copy of the complaint by certified mail, return receipt
requested, and first–class mail to the last known address of the person in actual possession
and, if different, to the address of the residential property subject to the complaint; and
(iii) Affix an attested copy of the summons conspicuously on the
property.
(4) If notice of the summons is sent to the person in possession in
accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection, the notice shall constitute sufficient
service to support restitution of possession.
(5) Service shall be made under paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection
within 4 business days after the complaint is filed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.